Utah statutes.
63M-1-1602.   Rural Development Program -- Supervision by office.

(1)  There is created within the Governor's Office of Economic Development the Office of Rural Development.

(2)  The Office of Rural Development is under the administration and general supervision of the Governor's Office of Economic Development.



Amended by Chapter 381, 2008 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

